apertium-pes.pes.dix
    <pardef n="S__را">

                              <e>       <p><l><b/>را</l><r><j/>را<s n="enc"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>

    </pardef>

 
    <pardef n="را__enc">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="enc"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

   
    
  
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>من</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>تو</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>او</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      
                              <e r="LR"><p><l>وی</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ما</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>شما</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>شماها</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>آن‌ها</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>آنها</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>آنان</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      
                              <e r="LR"><p><l>ایشان</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>خودم</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>خودت</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>خودش</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>خودمان</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>خودتان</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e r="LR"><p><l>خودشان</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="همه__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>همه</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خود__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>خود</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خویش__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>خویش</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خویشتن__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>خویشتن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="واین__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>واین</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="وان__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>وان</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنجا__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>آنجا</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="انجا__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>انجا</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="اینجا__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>اینجا</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="اینجانب__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>اینجانب</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنچه__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>آنچه</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="برخی__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>برخی</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بعضی__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>بعضی</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فلان__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>فلان</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فلانی__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>فلانی</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کی__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>کی</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یکدیگر__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>یکدیگر</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کس__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>کس</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کسى__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>کسى</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یکى__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>یکى</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هریک__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>هریک</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکدام__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>هرکدام</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکس__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>هرکس</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکسی__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>هرکسی</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هرکه__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>هرکه</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هم__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>هم</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="همدیگر__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>همدیگر</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنانی__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>آنانی</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنجایی__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l>آنجایی</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="که__rel">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

 
    <pardef n="این__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>هﺍ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

  
    <pardef n="خود__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

  
    <pardef n="هیچ__prn">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

 
    
   
    <pardef n="ﺩﺭ__pr">

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

                            <e lm="را"><i>را</i><par n="را__enc"/></e>
                            <e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="که"><i>که</i><par n="که__rel"/></e>
                            <e lm="این"><i>این</i><par n="این__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="آن"><i>آن</i><par n="این__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="شد"><i>شد</i><par n="این__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="هیچ"><i>هیچ</i><par n="هیچ__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="همه"><i>همه</i><par n="هیچ__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="هیچکس"><i>هیچکس</i><par n="هیچ__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="هیچیک"><i>هیچیک</i><par n="هیچ__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="خود"><i>خود</i><par n="خود__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="اندر"><i>اندر</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="از"><i>از</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="با"><i>با</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="بر"><i>بر</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="به"><i>به</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="بی"><i>بی</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="چون"><i>چون</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="در"><i>در</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="مثل"><i>مثل</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="تا"><i>تا</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="همچون"><i>همچون</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="برایم"><i>برایم</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="برایت"><i>برایت</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="برایش"><i>برایش</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="برایمان"><i>برایمان</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="برایتان"><i>برایتان</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="برایشان"><i>برایشان</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="اگر"><i>اگر</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="اگرچه"><i>اگرچه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="اگرنه"><i>اگرنه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="اگرهم"><i>اگرهم</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="اگه"><i>اگه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="پس"><i>پس</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="چه"><i>چه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="زیرا"><i>زیرا</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="کیست"><i>کیست</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="کـه"><i>کـه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="گرچه"><i>گرچه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="لکن"><i>لکن</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="مانند"><i>مانند</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="مبادا"><i>مبادا</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="واز"><i>واز</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="وبا"><i>وبا</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="وپس"><i>وپس</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="وگرنه"><i>وگرنه</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="ولیکن"><i>ولیکن</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="ولو"><i>ولو</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
                            <e lm="ولى"><i>ولى</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
